District of Columbia statutes.
7-651.08

Comfort care; alleviation of pain.

EMS personnel may provide the following interventions to a patient who is wearing an intact comfort care bracelet or necklace that has not been defaced to comfort the patient or alleviate pain:

(1)

Clear the airway, excluding artificial ventilation, esophageal obturator airway, or advanced airway management;

(2)

Administer suction;

(3)

Provide oxygen, excluding artificial ventilation, esophageal obturator airway, or advanced airway management;

(4)

Provide pain medication;

(5)

Control bleeding; or

(6)

Make comfort adjustments.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-224, § 9, 48 DCR 27

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-651.01.